Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.310

Motor truck.

"Motor truck" means any motor vehicle designed or used for the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight, or animals.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.310. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 32; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; 1921 c 96 s 2, part; 1919 c 59 s 1, part; 1917 c 155 s 1, part; 1915 c 142 s 2, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]